apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.ca.dix
    <pardef n="adme/tre__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tríem</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tria</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tríeu</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tries</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>trien</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tria</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>trem</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tré</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>treu</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tràs</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tran</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>trà</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tent</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tent</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>trérem</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tré</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tréreu</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>treres</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>treren</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>trà</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tem</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tem</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teu</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teu</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tin</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tin</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tre</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tre</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tíem</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tia</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tíeu</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ties</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tien</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tia</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>téssim</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>térem</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tés</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tera</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>téssiu</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>téreu</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tessis</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>teres</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tessin</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>teren</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tés</l>
          <r>tre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">

<e lm="admetre"><i>adme</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="permetre"><i>perme</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="comprometre"><i>comprome</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ometre"><i>ome</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prometre"><i>prome</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="remetre"><i>reme</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sotmetre"><i>sotme</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cometre"><i>come</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="transmetre"><i>transme</i><par n="adme/tre__vblex"/></e>
